Utah statutes.
58-71-302.   Qualifications for licensure.
(1)  An applicant for licensure as a naturopathic physician, except as set
forth in Subsection (2), shall:
(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division, which may
include:
(i)  submissions by the applicant of information maintained by practitioner
data banks, as designated by division rule, with respect to the applicant; and
(ii)  a record of professional liability claims made against the applicant and
settlements paid by or in behalf of the applicant;
(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;
(c)  be of good moral character;
(d)  provide satisfactory documentation of having successfully completed a
program of professional education preparing an individual as a naturopathic
physician, as evidenced by having received an earned degree of doctor of
naturopathic medicine from:
(i)  a naturopathic medical school or college accredited by the Council of
Naturopathic Medical Education or its successor organization approved by the
division;
(ii)  a naturopathic medical school or college that is a candidate for
accreditation by the Council of Naturopathic Medical Education or its
successor organization, and is approved by the division in collaboration with
the board, upon a finding there is reasonable expectation the school or
college will be accredited; or
(iii)  a naturopathic medical school or college which, at the time of the
applicant's graduation, met current criteria for accreditation by the Council
of Naturopathic Medical Education or its successor organization approved by
the division;
(e)  provide satisfactory documentation of having successfully completed,
after successful completion of the education requirements set forth in
Subsection (1)(d), 12 months of clinical experience in naturopathic medicine
in a residency program recognized by the division and associated with an
accredited school or college of naturopathic medicine, and under the
preceptorship of a licensed naturopathic physician, physician and surgeon, or
osteopathic physician;
(f)  pass the licensing examination sequence required by division rule
established in collaboration with the board;
(g)  be able to read, write, speak, understand, and be understood in the
English language and demonstrate proficiency to the satisfaction of the board
if requested by the board; and
(h)  meet with the board and representatives of the division, if requested,
for the purpose of evaluating the applicant's qualifications for licensure.
(2) (a)  In accordance with Subsection (2)(b), an applicant for licensure as a
naturopathic physician under the endorsement provision of Section 58-1-302
shall:
(i)  meet the requirements of Section 58-1-302;
(ii)  document having met all requirements for licensure under Subsection (1)
except the clinical experience requirement of Subsection (1)(e);
(iii)  have passed the examination requirements established under Subsection
(1)(f) which:
(A)  the applicant has not passed in connection with licensure in another
state or jurisdiction; and
(B)  are available to the applicant to take without requiring additional
professional education;
(iv)  have been actively engaged in the practice of a naturopathic physician
for not less than 6,000 hours during the five years immediately preceding the
date of application for licensure in Utah; and
(v)  meet with the board and representatives of the division for the purpose
of evaluating the applicant's qualifications for licensure.
(b)  The division may rely, either wholly or in part, on one or more
credentialing associations designated by division rule, made in collaboration
with the board, to document and certify in writing to the satisfaction of the
division that an applicant has met each of the requirements of this Subsection
(2), including the requirements of Section 58-1-302 that:
(i)  the applicant holds a current license;
(ii)  the education, experience, and examination requirements of the foreign
country or the state, district, or territory of the United States that issued
the applicant's license are, or were at the time the license was issued, equal
to those of this state for licensure as a naturopathic physician; and
(iii)  the applicant has produced evidence satisfactory to the division of the
applicant's qualifications, identity, and good standing as a naturopathic
physician.
